South Dakota, session 2026, HB1001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 34-35:
A person that owns land adjacent to state-owned land bordering the Missouri River
may burn the state-owned land in conjunction with the person's own land by utilizing
prescribed burning, provided the person submits a written request to the department
secretary or commissioner in control of the land and receives consent, in writing, stating
that the prescribed burn is an appropriate land management technique.
The written request for consent to utilize prescribed burning of the land must:
(1) Indicate that the purpose for the prescribed burning is to control or eradicate
woody species and provide grassland management;
(2) Include a description of the person's land and the state-owned land to be burned;
and
(3) Provide the timeframe within which the prescribed burn is to occur.
Written consent provided by the department secretary or a commissioner serves
as an authorization by the state, for purposes of § 5-4-15.
A person who receives written consent from the department secretary or a
commissioner to burn state-owned land in conjunction with the person's own land shall
ensure the availability of reasonable forces and equipment necessary to provide for fire
suppression and is responsible for complying with §§ 34-35-9 and 34-35-10, and with all
other applicable laws during the prescribed burn.
A person who receives written consent from the department secretary or a
commissioner to burn state-owned land in conjunction with the person's own land assumes
all liability for the burn. The state is immune from liability, and no cause of action for

26.400.11 2 1001
damages may arise against the state as a result of a prescribed burn conducted by a
person pursuant to this section.
Section 2. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.
HB1001 ENROLLED

26.400.11 3 1001
An Act to provide for prescribed burning of state-owned land by a person owning adjoining
land and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1001
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1001 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1001 ENROLLED